src/egy_lex/conj.lexc
!!!conj.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root
Conj;

LEXICON ConjInf
0:0 #;

LEXICON Conj
و ConjInf;
بس ConjInf;
عشان ConjInf;
علشان ConjInf;
بعد ConjInf;
بعدما ConjInf;
قبل ConjInf;
لكن ConjInf;
اذا ConjInf;
او ConjInf;
ولا ConjInf;
بعدين ConjInf;
ان ConjInf;
